Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act

§79-11-101.
Short title.

Section 79-11-101 et seq. shall be known and may be cited as the “Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws of 1987, ch. 485, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in the section was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 154, provides as follows:

“SECTION 154. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Power of water, sewer, garbage disposal, or fire protection districts to buy, lease or otherwise acquire assets and facilities of nonprofit corporation organized pursuant to the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act (§§ 79-11-101 et seq.), see § 19-5-181.

Application of Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act (§§ 79-11-101 et seq.) to amendment of articles of incorporation of “private foundations” (as defined in 26 USCS § 509(a)), see § 79-11-57.

Application to religious corporations, see § 79-11-401.

Use by volunteer fire departments incorporated under the provisions of the nonprofit corporation act of equipment purchased by a county with proceeds of the county volunteer fire department fund, see § 83-1-39.

Domestic mutual insurance holding company powers and compliance with nonprofit private corporation provisions, see § 83-31-149.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 33-37.

2A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Associations and Clubs §§ 27:5 et seq. (formation).

14 C.J.S., Charities §§ 91, 107, 108.

Note, Developments in the law: nonprofit corporations. 105 Harv L. Rev. 1579.

§79-11-103.
Amendments and repeals.

The Mississippi Legislature has power to amend or repeal all or part of Section 79-11-101 et seq. at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to Section 79-11-101 et seq. are governed by the amendment or repeal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 2, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, typographical errors in the section were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.”
both times it appears. The corrections were ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

§79-11-105.
Requirements for filing of documents.

A document must satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section that adds to or varies these requirements, to be entitled to filing by the Secretary of State.

Section 79-11-101 et seq. must require or permit filing the document in the office of the Secretary of State.

The document must contain the information required by Section 79-11-101 et seq. It may contain other information as well.

The document must be typewritten or printed or, if electronically transmitted, it must be in a format that can be retrieved or reproduced by the Secretary of State in typewritten or printed form.

The document must be in the English language. However, a corporate name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals, and the certificate of existence required of a foreign corporation need not be in English if accompanied by a reasonably authenticated English translation.

The document must be signed:

By the presiding officer of its board of directors, its president or by another of its officers;

If directors have not been selected or the corporation has not been formed, by an incorporator; or

If the corporation is in the hands of a receiver, trustee or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

The person executing a document shall sign it and state beneath or opposite the signature his or her name and the capacity in which he or she signs. The document may, but need not, contain:

A corporate seal;

An attestation;

An acknowledgement or verification. A document required or permitted to be filed under this chapter which contains a copy of a signature, however made, is acceptable for filing.

If the Secretary of State has prescribed a mandatory form for a document under Section 79-11-107, the document must be in or on the prescribed form.

The document must be delivered to the office of the Secretary of State for filing. Delivery may be made by electronic transmission if, to the extent, and in the manner permitted by the Secretary of State. If the document is filed in typewritten or printed form and not transmitted electronically, the Secretary of State may require one (1) exact or conformed copy to be delivered with the document except as otherwise provided in Sections 79-11-167 and 79-11-379.

When the document is delivered to the office of the Secretary of State for filing, the correct filing fee and any franchise tax, license fee or penalty required by Section 79-11-101 et seq. or other law must be paid or provision for payment made in a manner permitted by the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 362, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Sections 79-11-167 and
79-11-379, referred to in this section, were repealed by § 133, Chapter 382, Laws of 2012, effective January 1, 2013.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Requirements for filing of documents under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-1.20.

Requirement that Secretary of State file all documents meeting requirements set forth in this section, see § 79-11-115.

§79-11-107.
Secretary may prescribe forms.

The Secretary of State may prescribe and furnish, on request, forms for: (a) an application for a certificate of existence; (b) a foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state; (c) a foreign corporation’s application for a certificate of withdrawal; and (d) the status report. If the Secretary of State so requires, use of these forms is mandatory.

The Secretary of State may prescribe and furnish on request forms for other documents required or permitted to be filed by Section 79-11-101 et seq., but their use is not mandatory.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (2) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Secretary of State may prescribe forms under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-1.21.

Duties and authority of Secretary of State with respect to nonprofit corporations, see §§ 79-11-107, 79-11-109, 79-11-115, 79-11-125, 79-11-167, 79-11-307, 79-11-347 through 79-11-353, 79-11-379, 79-11-383 through 79-11-387, and 79-11-391.

Requirements for filing documents, see § 79-11-105.

§79-11-109.
Filing fees; fee for serving process upon Secretary of State; fees for copying and certifying copy of filed document.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the Secretary of State shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection are delivered for filing:

Click to view

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the Secretary of State shall collect a fee of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) upon being served with process under Section 79-11-101 et seq. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover the fee paid the Secretary of State as costs if the party prevails in the proceeding.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, the Secretary of State shall collect the following fees for copying and certifying the copy of any filed document relating to a domestic or foreign corporation:

One Dollar ($1.00) a page for copying; and

Ten Dollars ($10.00) for the certificate.

The Secretary of State may collect a filing fee greater than the fee set forth in subsections (1), (2) and (3) in an amount not to exceed twice the fee set forth in subsections (1), (2) and (3) of processing the filing, if the form prescribed by the Secretary of State for such filing has not been used.

Document Fee (a) Articles of incorporation $50.00 (b) [Reserved] (c) Application for reserved name 25.00 (d) Notice of transfer or cancellation of reserved name 25.00 (e) [Reserved] (f) [Reserved] (g) [Reserved] (h) [Reserved] (i) [Reserved] (j) Amendment of articles of incorporation 50.00 (k) Restatement of articles of incorporation with amendments 50.00 () l Articles of merger 50.00 (m) Articles of dissolution 25.00 (n) Articles of revocation of dissolution 25.00 (o) Certificate of administrative dissolution No Fee (p) Application for reinstatement following administrative dissolution 50.00 (q) Certificate of reinstatement No Fee (r) Certificate of judicial dissolution No Fee (s) Application for certificate of authority 100.00 (t) Application for amended certificate of authority 50.00 Application for certificate of withdrawal 25.00 (v) Certificate of revocation of authority to transact business No Fee (w) Status report 25.00 (x) Articles of correction 50.00 (y) Application for certificate of existence or authorization 25.00 (z) Any other document required or permitted to be filedby et seq 25.00 Section 79-11-101

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 323, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 52; Laws, 2014, ch. 468, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (2) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted former (1)(g), (h) and (i), which read: “(g) Corporation’s statement of change of registered agent or registered office or both....10.00,” “(h) Agent’s statement of change of registered office for each affected corporation ....10.00, not to exceed a total of .....1,000.00” and “(i) Agent’s statement of resignation ...No Fee” and reserved (1)(g), (h) and (i) for future use.

The 2014 amendment, in (1)(b), substituted “[Reserved]” for “Application for use of indistinguishable name . . . 25.00”; in (1)(e), substituted “[Reserved]” for “Application for registered name . . . 50.00”; and in (1)(f), substituted “[Reserved]” for “Application for renewal of registered name . . . 50.00.”

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Filing fees under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-1.22.

Applicability of this section to civil penalty a foreign corporation is liable for when it transacts business without certificate of authority, see § 79-11-365.

§79-11-111.
Effective date of filed documents.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a document is effective:

At the date and time of filing, as evidenced by such means as the Secretary of State may use for the purpose of recording the date and time of filing; or

At the time specified in the document as its effective time on the date it is filed.

A document may specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so, the document becomes effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but no time is specified, the document is effective at the close of business on that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the ninetieth day after the date filed.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, any document that has a delayed effective time and date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, the parties to the document file a certification of cancellation with the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 6; Laws, 1994, ch. 417, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Effective date of corporation’s filed documents, see § 79-4-1.23.

§79-11-113.
Correction of filed documents.

A domestic or foreign corporation may correct a document filed by the Secretary of State if (a) the document contains an inaccuracy, or (b) the document was defectively signed, attested, sealed, verified or acknowledged, or (c) the electronic transmission was defective.

A document is corrected:

By preparing articles of correction that: (i) describe the document (including its filing date) or attach a copy of it to the articles, (ii) specify the inaccuracy or defect to be corrected, and (iii) correct the inaccuracy or defect; and

By delivering the articles of correction to the office of the Secretary of State for filing.

Articles of correction are effective on the effective date of the document they correct except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, articles of correction are effective when filed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 7; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 44, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

§79-11-115.
Secretary of State to file documents; refusal to file document; filing of documents as ministerial.

If a document delivered to the Office of the Secretary of State for filing satisfies the requirements of Section 79-11-105, the Secretary of State shall file it.

The Secretary of State files a document by recording it as filed on the date and time of receipt. After filing a document, except as provided in Section 79-35-11, the Secretary of State shall deliver to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative a copy of the document with an acknowledgement of the date and time of filing.

Upon refusing to file a document, the Secretary of State shall return it to the domestic or foreign corporation or its representative within five (5) days after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason or reasons for the refusal.

The Secretary of State’s duty to file documents under this section is ministerial. Filing or refusal to file a document does not:

Affect the validity or invalidity of the document, in whole or in part;

Relate to the correctness or incorrectness of information contained in the document; or

Create a presumption that the document is valid or invalid or that information contained in the document is correct or incorrect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 8; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 45; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 53, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “Section 79-35-11” for “Sections 79-11-167 and 79-11-379” in the last sentence of (2).

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Duty of Secretary of State to file business corporation documents, refusal to file, see § 79-4-1.25.

§79-11-117.
Appeal of refusal to file document.

If the Secretary of State refuses to file a document delivered for filing to the Secretary of State’s office, the domestic or foreign corporation may appeal the refusal to the chancery court in the county where the corporation’s principal office is or will be located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state. The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel filing the document and by attaching to the petition the document and the Secretary of State’s explanation of the refusal to file.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to file the document or take other action the court considered appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 9; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 54, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in the first sentence of (1), substituted “principal office is or will be located” for “principal office (or, if there is none in this state, its registered office) is or will be located” and added “or the Chancery Court
. . . in this state” at the end..

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Appeal from refusal to file business corporation document, see § 79-4-1.26.

§79-11-119.
Certified copy of document as conclusive evidence of filing.

A certificate from the Secretary of State delivered with a copy of a document filed by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 10; Laws, 1997, ch. 418 § 46, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

§79-11-121.
Certificate of existence, application for; contents of; conclusive evidence of good standing.

Any person may apply to the Secretary of State to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic or foreign corporation.

The certificate of existence sets forth:

The domestic corporation’s corporate name or the foreign corporation’s corporate name used in this state;

That (i) the domestic corporation is duly incorporated under the law of this state, the date of its incorporation and the period of its duration if less than perpetual; or (ii) that the foreign corporation is authorized to transact business in this state;

That all fees, taxes, and penalties owed to this state have been paid, if (i) payment is reflected in the records of the Secretary of State and (ii) nonpayment affects the good standing of the domestic or foreign corporation;

That its most recent status report required by Section 79-11-391 has been delivered to the Secretary of State;

That articles of dissolution have not been filed; and

Other facts of record in the Office of the Secretary of State that may be requested by the application.

Subject to any qualification stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence issued by the Secretary of State may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign corporation is in existence or is authorized to conduct activities in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 11; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, substituted “existence or is authorized to conduct activities” for ”good standing” near the end of (3).

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Application for and contents of certificate of existence for corporation, see § 79-4-1.28.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

§79-11-123.
Signing false document which is to be filed as offense; penalty.

A person commits an offense by signing a document such person knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 12, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Penalty for signing false document, corporations, see § 79-4-1.29.

Imposition of standard state assessment in addition to all court imposed fines or other penalties for any misdemeanor violation, see § 99-19-73.

§79-11-125.
Secretary granted power to perform duties.

The Secretary of State has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of the Secretary of State’s office by Section 79-11-101 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 13, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in the section was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

§79-11-127.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires in Section 79-11-101 et seq., the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed herein:

“Approved by (or approval by) the members” means approved or ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the votes represented and voting at a duly held meeting at which a quorum is present (which affirmative votes also constitute a majority of the required quorum) or by a written ballot or written consent in conformity with Section 79-11-101 et seq. or by the affirmative vote, written ballot or written consent of such greater proportion, including the votes of all the members of any class, unit or grouping as may be provided in the articles, bylaws or Section 79-11-101 et seq. for any specified member action.

“Articles of incorporation” or “articles” include amended and restated articles of incorporation and articles of merger.

“Board” or “board of directors” means the board of directors except that no person or group of persons are the board of directors because of powers delegated to that person or group pursuant to Section 79-11-231.

“Bylaws” means the code or codes of rules (other than the articles) adopted pursuant to Section 79-11-101 et seq. for the regulation or management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name or names by which such rules are designated.

“Class” means a group of memberships which have the same rights with respect to voting, dissolution, redemption and transfer. For the purposes of this section, rights shall be considered the same if they are determined by a formula applied uniformly.

“Conspicuous” means so written, displayed, or presented that a reasonable person against whom the record is to operate should have noticed it. For example, text in italics, boldface, contrasting color or capitals, or that is underlined, is conspicuous.

“Corporation” means a nonprofit corporation subject to the provisions of Section 79-11-101 et seq., except a foreign corporation.

“Delegates” means those persons elected or appointed to vote in a representative assembly for the election of a director or directors or on other matters.

“Deliver” or “delivery” means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery and electronic transmission, except that delivery to the Secretary of State means actual receipt by the Secretary of State.

“Directors” means individuals, designated in the articles or bylaws or elected by the incorporators, and their successors and individuals elected or appointed by any other name or title to act as members of the board.

“Distribution” means the payment of a dividend or any part of the income or profit of a corporation to its members, directors or officers. Payment of reasonable compensation, fees, or expenses incurred in the performance of duties on behalf of the corporation is not a distribution.

“Domestic corporation” means a corporation.

“Effective date of notice” is defined in Section 79-11-129.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic transmission” or “electronically transmitted” means any process of communication not directly involving the physical transfer of paper that is suitable for the retention, retrieval and reproduction of information by the recipient.

“Employee” includes an officer but not a director. A director may accept duties that make the director an employee.

“Entity” includes corporation and foreign corporation; business corporation and foreign business corporation; profit and nonprofit unincorporated association; corporation sole; business trust, estate, partnership, trust and two (2) or more persons having a joint or common economic interest; and state, United States and foreign government.

“File,” “filed” or “filing” means filed in the Office of the Secretary of State.

“Foreign corporation” means a corporation organized under a law other than the law of this state which would be a nonprofit corporation if formed under the laws of this state.

“Governmental subdivision” includes authority, county, district and municipality.

“Includes” denotes a partial definition.

“Individual” includes the estate of an incompetent individual.

“Means” denotes a complete definition.

“Member” means (without regard to what a person is called in the articles or bylaws) any person or persons who on more than one (1) occasion, pursuant to a provision of a corporation’s articles or bylaws, have the right to vote for the election of a director or directors.

A person is not a member by virtue of any of the following:

Any rights such person has as a delegate;

Any rights such person has to designate a director or directors; or

Any rights such person has as a director.

“Membership” refers to the rights and obligations a member or members have pursuant to a corporation’s articles, bylaws and Section 79-11-101 et seq.

“Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation, no part of the assets, income or profit of which is distributed to or enures to the benefit of its members, directors or officers, except as otherwise provided under this chapter. In a corporation all of whose members are nonprofit corporations, distribution to members does not deprive it of the status of a nonprofit corporation.

“Notice” is defined in Section 79-11-129.

“Person” includes any individual or entity.

“Principal office” means the office (in or out of this state) where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign corporation are located.

“Proceeding” includes civil suit and criminal, administrative and investigatory action.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Record date” means the date established under Section 79-11-209 on which a corporation determines the identity of its members for the purposes of Section 79-11-101 et seq.

“Religious corporation” means a corporation organized and operating primarily or exclusively for religious purposes.

“Secretary” means the corporate officer to whom the board of directors has delegated responsibility under Section 79-11-273 for custody of the minutes of the directors’ and members’ meetings and for authenticating the records of the corporation.

“Sign” means with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic sound, symbol, or process as defined under Mississippi law.

“State,” when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state and commonwealth (and their agencies and governmental subdivisions) and a territory, and insular possession (and their agencies and governmental subdivisions) of the United States.

“United States” includes any district, authority, bureau, commission, department and any other agency of the United States.

“Vote” includes authorization by written ballot and written consent.

“Voting power” means the total number of votes entitled to be cast for the election of directors at the time the determination of voting power is made, excluding a vote which is contingent upon the happening of a condition or event that has not occurred at the time. Where a class is entitled to vote as a class for directors, the determination of voting power of the class shall be based on the percentage of the number of directors the class is entitled to elect out of the total number of authorized directors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 14; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 47; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 2, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, added (f), (n), (z) and (ee); redesignated former (f) through (

l

) as present (g) through (m), former (m) through (w) as present (o) through (y), former (x) through (aa) as present (aa) through (dd), and former (bb) through (ii) as present (ff) through (mm), added “except that delivery to the Secretary of State means actual receipt by the Secretary of State” at the end of (i), added the last sentence in (k), and rewrote (ii).

Citizens who intervened after a city’s case against a non-profit corporation for negligent entrustment of trust properties was dismissed also lacked standing to pursue the claims regarding the corporation’s sale of a hospital to a for-profit corporation because under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-11-155, the citizens were not corporate members under Miss. Code Ann. § 79-11-127, nor was the action pursued in the name of the State. City of Picayune v. Southern Reg'l Corp., 916 So. 2d 510, 2005 Miss. LEXIS 810 (Miss. 2005).

A community hospital board of trustees would have authority to cause to be incorporated a nonprofit foundation to solicit contributions and raise funds to support the hospital and its activities, but would be subject to the prohibitions against having any financial interest in the foundation; since such boards are entities and persons authorized to act as incorporators of Mississippi nonprofit corporations, a board would be authorized to act as an incorporator of a nonprofit foundation which would solicit contributions to support hospital activities. O’Donnell, March 27, 1998, A.G. Op. #98-0169.

A community hospital may act as the sole member of a Mississippi nonprofit corporation engaged in the delivery of health care services, including ambulatory surgery services, to the citizens of its service area.
Williamson, May 22, 1998, A.G. Op. #98-0269.

For purposes of creating a nonprofit corporation, a county is an “entity” within the meaning of subsection (o) of this section, and is therefore a “person” within the meaning of subsection (y) of this section; thus, a county qualifies as a “member” pursuant to subsection (v) of this section and may serve as a member of a nonprofit corporation as permitted by § 79-11-175.
Griffith, July 23, 1999, A.G. Op. #99-0370.

§79-11-129.
Notice, types; when effective; how addressed; electronic communications.

Notice under this chapter must be in the form of a record unless oral notice is authorized by this chapter or is reasonable under the circumstances.

Notice may be communicated in person or by delivery. If these forms of communication are impracticable, notice may be communicated by a newspaper of general circulation in the area where published; or by radio, television or other form of public broadcast communication.

Oral notice is effective when communicated if communicated in a comprehensible manner.

Written notice by a domestic or foreign corporation to a member, if in a comprehensible form, is effective:

Upon deposit in the United States mail, if the postage or delivery charge is paid and the notice is correctly addressed to the member’s address shown in the corporation’s current record of members, or

When given if the notice is delivered in any other manner that the member has authorized.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, written notice, if in a comprehensible form, is effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed;

On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee.

Written notice is correctly addressed to a member of a domestic or foreign corporation if addressed to the member’s address shown in the corporation’s current list of members.

A written notice or report delivered as part of a newsletter, magazine or other publication regularly sent to members shall constitute a written notice or report if addressed or delivered to the member’s address shown in the corporation’s current list of members, or in the case of members who are residents of the same household and who have the same address in the corporation’s current list of members, if addressed or delivered to one of such members, at the address appearing on the current list of members.

Written notice is correctly addressed to a domestic or foreign corporation (authorized to transact business in this state), other than in its capacity as a member, if addressed to its registered agent or to its secretary at its principal office shown in its most recent status report or, in the case of a foreign corporation that has not yet delivered a status report, in its application for a certificate of authority.

If Section 79-11-205 or any other provision of Section 79-11-101 et seq. prescribes notice requirements for particular circumstances, those requirements govern. If articles or bylaws prescribe notice requirements, not inconsistent with this section or other provisions of Section 79-11-101 et seq., those requirements govern.

With respect to electronic communications:

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, or otherwise agreed between the sender and the recipient, an electronic communication is received when:

It enters an information processing system that the recipient has designated or uses for the purpose of receiving electronic records or information of the type sent and from which the recipient is able to retrieve the electronic record; and

It is in a form capable of being processed by that system.

An electronic communication is received under subsection (10)(a) even if no individual is aware of its receipt.

Receipt of an electronic acknowledgement from an information processing system described in subsection (10)(a) establishes that a record was received but, by itself, does not establish that the content sent corresponds to the content received.

An authorization by a member of delivery of notices or communications by e-mail or similar electronic means may be revoked by the member by notice to the nonprofit corporation in the form of a record. Such an authorization is deemed revoked if (a) the corporation is unable to deliver two (2) consecutive notices or other communications to the member in the manner authorized; and (b) the inability becomes known to the secretary or other person responsible for giving the notice or other communication; but the failure to treat the inability as a revocation does not invalidate any meeting or other action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 15; Laws, 1997, ch. 418, § 48; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, rewrote (1); substituted “or by delivery” for “by mail or other method of delivery; or by telephone, voice mail or other electronic means” in the first sentence in (2); rewrote (4); and added (10) and (11).

Notice under the Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-1.41.

Applicability of this section to definition of “effective date of notice” for purposes of Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-127.

§79-11-131.
Petition to chancery court for alternative method for calling or conducting meeting of corporation members, delegates, or directors, or for obtaining their consent.

If for any reason it is impractical or impossible for any corporation to call or conduct a meeting of its members, delegates or directors, or otherwise obtain their consent, in the manner prescribed by its articles, bylaws or Section 79-11-101 et seq., then upon petition of a director, officer, delegate, member or the Attorney General, the chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state, may order that such a meeting be called or that a written ballot or other form of obtaining the vote of members, delegates or directors be authorized in such a manner as the court finds fair and equitable under the circumstances.

The court shall, in an order issued pursuant to this section, provide for a method of notice reasonably designed to give actual notice to all persons who would be entitled to notice of a meeting held pursuant to the articles, bylaws and Section 79-11-101 et seq., whether or not the method results in actual notice to all such persons or conforms to the notice requirements that would otherwise apply. In a proceeding under this section the court may determine who the members or directors are.

The order issued pursuant to this section may dispense with any requirement relating to the holding of or voting at meetings or obtaining votes, including any requirement as to quorums or as to the number or percentage of votes needed for approval, that would otherwise be imposed by the articles, bylaws or Section 79-11-101 et seq.

Whenever practical any order issued pursuant to this section shall limit the subject matter of meetings or other forms of consent authorized to items, including amendments to the articles or bylaws, the resolution of which will or may enable the corporation to continue managing its affairs without further resort to this section; provided, however, that an order under this section may also authorize the obtaining of whatever votes and approvals are necessary for the dissolution, merger or sale of assets.

Any meeting or other method of obtaining the vote of members, delegates or directors conducted pursuant to an order issued under this section, and which complies with all the provisions of such order, is for all purposes a valid meeting or vote, as the case may be, and shall have the force and effect as if it complied with every requirement imposed by the articles, bylaws and Section 79-11-101 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 16; brought forward and amended, Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 55, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsections (1), (2) (3) and (5) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The corrections were ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, brought forward and amended the section by substituting “principal office is located, or the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the corporation does not have a principal office in this state” for “principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located” near the end of (1).

Attorney General generally, see §§ 7-5-1 et seq.